Utah statutes.
20A-7-703.   Impartial analysis of measure -- Determination of fiscal
effects.
(1)  The director of the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel,
after the approval of the legislative general counsel as to legal sufficiency,
shall:
(a)  prepare an impartial analysis of each measure submitted to the voters by
the Legislature or by initiative or referendum petition; and
(b)  submit the impartial analysis to the lieutenant governor no later than
the day that falls 75 days before the date of the election in which the
measure will appear on the ballot.
(2)  The director shall ensure that the impartial analysis:
(a)  is not more than 1,000 words long;
(b)  is prepared in clear and concise language that will easily be understood
by the average voter;
(c)  avoids the use of technical terms as much as possible;
(d)  shows the effect of the measure on existing law;
(e)  identifies any potential conflicts with the United States or Utah
Constitutions raised by the measure;
(f)  fairly describes the operation of the measure;
(g)  identifies the measure's fiscal effects for the first full year of
implementation and the first year when the last provisions to be implemented
are fully effective; and
(h)  identifies the amount of any increase or decrease in revenue or cost to
state or local government.
(3)  The director shall analyze the measure as it is proposed to be adopted
without considering any implementing legislation, unless the implementing
legislation has been enacted and will become effective upon the adoption of
the measure by the voters.
(4) (a)  In determining the fiscal effects of a measure, the director shall
confer with the legislative fiscal analyst.
(b)  The director shall consider any measure that requires implementing
legislation in order to take effect to have no financial effect, unless
implementing legislation has been enacted that will become effective upon
adoption of the measure by the voters.
(5)  If the director requests the assistance of any state department, agency,
or official in preparing his analysis, that department, agency, or official
shall assist the director.
